epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/tk.xml
	<patterns>
		1-4
		ä1bä
		ä1be
		ä1bi
		ä1bö
		ä1bü
		ä1çä
		ä1çe
		ä1çi
		ä1çö
		ä1çü
		ä1dä
		ä1de
		ä1di
		ä1dö
		ä1dü
		ä1fä
		ä1fe
		ä1fi
		ä1fö
		ä1fü
		ä1gä
		ä1ge
		ä1gi
		ä1gö
		ä1gü
		ä1hä
		ä1he
		ä1hi
		ä1hö
		ä1hü
		ä1jä
		ä1je
		ä1ji
		ä1jö
		ä1jü
		ä1kä
		ä1ke
		ä1ki
		ä1kö
		ä1kü
		ä1lä
		ä1le
		ä1li
		ä1lö
		ä1lü
		ä1mä
		ä1me
		ä1mi
		ä1mö
		ä1mü
		ä1nä
		ä1ne
		ä1ni
		ä1nö
		ä1nü
		ä1pä
		ä1pe
		ä1pi
		ä1pö
		ä1pü
		ä1rä
		ä1re
		ä1ri
		ä1rö
		ä1rü
		ä1sä
		ä1se
		ä1si
		ä1sö
		ä1sü
		ä1tä
		ä1te
		ä1ti
		ä1tö
		ä1tü
		ä1wä
		ä1we
		ä1wi
		ä1wö
		ä1wü
		ä1ýä
		ä1ýe
		ä1ýi
		ä1ýö
		ä1ýü
		ä1zä
		ä1ze
		ä1zi
		ä1zö
		ä1zü
		ä1ňä
		ä1ňe
		ä1ňi
		ä1ňö
		ä1ňü
		ä1žä
		ä1že
		ä1ži
		ä1žö
		ä1žü
		ä1şä
		ä1şe
		ä1şi
		ä1şö
		ä1şü
		e1bä
		e1be
		e1bi
		e1bö
		e1bü
		e1çä
		e1çe
		e1çi
		e1çö
		e1çü
		e1dä
		e1de
		e1di
		e1dö
		e1dü
		e1fä
		e1fe
		e1fi
		e1fö
		e1fü
		e1gä
		e1ge
		e1gi
		e1gö
		e1gü
		e1hä
		e1he
		e1hi
		e1hö
		e1hü
		e1jä
		e1je
		e1ji
		e1jö
		e1jü
		e1kä
		e1ke
		e1ki
		e1kö
		e1kü
		e1lä
		e1le
		e1li
		e1lö
		e1lü
		e1mä
		e1me
		e1mi
		e1mö
		e1mü
		e1nä
		e1ne
		e1ni
		e1nö
		e1nü
		e1pä
		e1pe
		e1pi
		e1pö
		e1pü
		e1rä
		e1re
		e1ri
		e1rö
		e1rü
		e1sä
		e1se
		e1si
		e1sö
		e1sü
		e1tä
		e1te
		e1ti
		e1tö
		e1tü
		e1wä
		e1we
		e1wi
		e1wö
		e1wü
		e1ýä
		e1ýe
		e1ýi
		e1ýö
		e1ýü
		e1zä
		e1ze
		e1zi
		e1zö
		e1zü
		e1ňä
		e1ňe
		e1ňi
		e1ňö
		e1ňü
		e1žä
		e1že
		e1ži
		e1žö
		e1žü
		e1şä
		e1şe
		e1şi
		e1şö
		e1şü
		i1bä
		i1be
		i1bi
		i1bö
		i1bü
		i1çä
		i1çe
		i1çi
		i1çö
		i1çü
		i1dä
		i1de
		i1di
		i1dö
		i1dü
		i1fä
		i1fe
		i1fi
		i1fö
		i1fü
		i1gä
		i1ge
		i1gi
		i1gö
		i1gü
		i1hä
		i1he
		i1hi
		i1hö
		i1hü
		i1jä
		i1je
		i1ji
		i1jö
		i1jü
		i1kä
		i1ke
		i1ki
		i1kö
		i1kü
		i1lä
		i1le
		i1li
		i1lö
		i1lü
		i1mä
		i1me
		i1mi
		i1mö
		i1mü
		i1nä
		i1ne
		i1ni
		i1nö
		i1nü
		i1pä
		i1pe
		i1pi
		i1pö
		i1pü
		i1rä
		i1re
		i1ri
		i1rö
		i1rü
		i1sä
		i1se
		i1si
		i1sö
		i1sü
		i1tä
		i1te
		i1ti
		i1tö
		i1tü
		i1wä
		i1we
		i1wi
		i1wö
		i1wü
		i1ýä
		i1ýe
		i1ýi
		i1ýö
		i1ýü
		i1zä
		i1ze
		i1zi
		i1zö
		i1zü
		i1ňä
		i1ňe
		i1ňi
		i1ňö
		i1ňü
		i1žä
		i1že
		i1ži
		i1žö
		i1žü
		i1şä
		i1şe
		i1şi
		i1şö
		i1şü
		ö1bä
		ö1be
		ö1bi
		ö1bö
		ö1bü
		ö1çä
		ö1çe
		ö1çi
		ö1çö
		ö1çü
		ö1dä
		ö1de
		ö1di
		ö1dö
		ö1dü
		ö1fä
		ö1fe
		ö1fi
		ö1fö
		ö1fü
		ö1gä
		ö1ge
		ö1gi
		ö1gö
		ö1gü
		ö1hä
		ö1he
		ö1hi
		ö1hö
		ö1hü
		ö1jä
		ö1je
		ö1ji
		ö1jö
		ö1jü
		ö1kä
		ö1ke
		ö1ki
		ö1kö
		ö1kü
		ö1lä
		ö1le
		ö1li
		ö1lö
		ö1lü
		ö1mä
		ö1me
		ö1mi
		ö1mö
		ö1mü
		ö1nä
		ö1ne
		ö1ni
		ö1nö
		ö1nü
		ö1pä
		ö1pe
		ö1pi
		ö1pö
		ö1pü
		ö1rä
		ö1re
		ö1ri
		ö1rö
		ö1rü
		ö1sä
		ö1se
		ö1si
		ö1sö
		ö1sü
		ö1tä
		ö1te
		ö1ti
		ö1tö
		ö1tü
		ö1wä
		ö1we
		ö1wi
		ö1wö
		ö1wü
		ö1ýä
		ö1ýe
		ö1ýi
		ö1ýö
		ö1ýü
		ö1zä
		ö1ze
		ö1zi
		ö1zö
		ö1zü
		ö1ňä
		ö1ňe
		ö1ňi
		ö1ňö
		ö1ňü
		ö1žä
		ö1že
		ö1ži
		ö1žö
		ö1žü
		ö1şä
		ö1şe
		ö1şi
		ö1şö
		ö1şü
		ü1bä
		ü1be
		ü1bi
		ü1bö
		ü1bü
		ü1çä
		ü1çe
		ü1çi
		ü1çö
		ü1çü
		ü1dä
		ü1de
		ü1di
		ü1dö
		ü1dü
		ü1fä
		ü1fe
		ü1fi
		ü1fö
		ü1fü
		ü1gä
		ü1ge
		ü1gi
		ü1gö
		ü1gü
		ü1hä
		ü1he
		ü1hi
		ü1hö
		ü1hü
		ü1jä
		ü1je
		ü1ji
		ü1jö
		ü1jü
		ü1kä
		ü1ke
		ü1ki
		ü1kö
		ü1kü
		ü1lä
		ü1le
		ü1li
		ü1lö
		ü1lü
		ü1mä
		ü1me
		ü1mi
		ü1mö
		ü1mü
		ü1nä
		ü1ne
		ü1ni
		ü1nö
		ü1nü
		ü1pä
		ü1pe
		ü1pi
		ü1pö
		ü1pü
		ü1rä
		ü1re
		ü1ri
		ü1rö
		ü1rü
		ü1sä
		ü1se
		ü1si
		ü1sö
		ü1sü
		ü1tä
		ü1te
		ü1ti
		ü1tö
		ü1tü
		ü1wä
		ü1we
		ü1wi
		ü1wö
		ü1wü
		ü1ýä
		ü1ýe
		ü1ýi
		ü1ýö
		ü1ýü
		ü1zä
		ü1ze
		ü1zi
		ü1zö
		ü1zü
		ü1ňä
		ü1ňe
		ü1ňi
		ü1ňö
		ü1ňü
		ü1žä
		ü1že
		ü1ži
		ü1žö
		ü1žü
		ü1şä
		ü1şe
		ü1şi
		ü1şö
		ü1şü
		a1ba
		a1by
		a1bo
		a1bu
		a1ça
		a1çy
		a1ço
		a1çu
		a1da
		a1dy
		a1do
		a1du
		a1fa
		a1fy
		a1fo
		a1fu
		a1ga
		a1gy
		a1go
		a1gu
		a1ha
		a1hy
		a1ho
		a1hu
		a1ja
		a1jy
		a1jo
		a1ju
		a1ka
		a1ky
		a1ko
		a1ku
		a1la
		a1ly
		a1lo
		a1lu
		a1ma
		a1my
		a1mo
		a1mu
		a1na
		a1ny
		a1no
		a1nu
		a1pa
		a1py
		a1po
		a1pu
		a1ra
		a1ry
		a1ro
		a1ru
		a1sa
		a1sy
		a1so
		a1su
		a1ta
		a1ty
		a1to
		a1tu
		a1wa
		a1wy
		a1wo
		a1wu
		a1ýa
		a1ýy
		a1ýo
		a1ýu
		a1za
		a1zy
		a1zo
		a1zu
		a1ňa
		a1ňy
		a1ňo
		a1ňu
		a1ža
		a1žy
		a1žo
		a1žu
		a1şa
		a1şy
		a1şo
		a1şu
		y1ba
		y1by
		y1bo
		y1bu
		y1ça
		y1çy
		y1ço
		y1çu
		y1da
		y1dy
		y1do
		y1du
		y1fa
		y1fy
		y1fo
		y1fu
		y1ga
		y1gy
		y1go
		y1gu
		y1ha
		y1hy
		y1ho
		y1hu
		y1ja
		y1jy
		y1jo
		y1ju
		y1ka
		y1ky
		y1ko
		y1ku
		y1la
		y1ly
		y1lo
		y1lu
		y1ma
		y1my
		y1mo
		y1mu
		y1na
		y1ny
		y1no
		y1nu
		y1pa
		y1py
		y1po
		y1pu
		y1ra
		y1ry
		y1ro
		y1ru
		y1sa
		y1sy
		y1so
		y1su
		y1ta
		y1ty
		y1to
		y1tu
		y1wa
		y1wy
		y1wo
		y1wu
		y1ýa
		y1ýy
		y1ýo
		y1ýu
		y1za
		y1zy
		y1zo
		y1zu
		y1ňa
		y1ňy
		y1ňo
		y1ňu
		y1ža
		y1žy
		y1žo
		y1žu
		y1şa
		y1şy
		y1şo
		y1şu
		o1ba
		o1by
		o1bo
		o1bu
		o1ça
		o1çy
		o1ço
		o1çu
		o1da
		o1dy
		o1do
		o1du
		o1fa
		o1fy
		o1fo
		o1fu
		o1ga
		o1gy
		o1go
		o1gu
		o1ha
		o1hy
		o1ho
		o1hu
		o1ja
		o1jy
		o1jo
		o1ju
		o1ka
		o1ky
		o1ko
		o1ku
		o1la
		o1ly
		o1lo
		o1lu
		o1ma
		o1my
		o1mo
		o1mu
		o1na
		o1ny
		o1no
		o1nu
		o1pa
		o1py
		o1po
		o1pu
		o1ra
		o1ry
		o1ro
		o1ru
		o1sa
		o1sy
		o1so
		o1su
		o1ta
		o1ty
		o1to
		o1tu
		o1wa
		o1wy
		o1wo
		o1wu
		o1ýa
		o1ýy
		o1ýo
		o1ýu
		o1za
		o1zy
		o1zo
		o1zu
		o1ňa
		o1ňy
		o1ňo
		o1ňu
		o1ža
		o1žy
		o1žo
		o1žu
		o1şa
		o1şy
		o1şo
		o1şu
		u1ba
		u1by
		u1bo
		u1bu
		u1ça
		u1çy
		u1ço
		u1çu
		u1da
		u1dy
		u1do
		u1du
		u1fa
		u1fy
		u1fo
		u1fu
		u1ga
		u1gy
		u1go
		u1gu
		u1ha
		u1hy
		u1ho
		u1hu
		u1ja
		u1jy
		u1jo
		u1ju
		u1ka
		u1ky
		u1ko
		u1ku
		u1la
		u1ly
		u1lo
		u1lu
		u1ma
		u1my
		u1mo
		u1mu
		u1na
		u1ny
		u1no
		u1nu
		u1pa
		u1py
		u1po
		u1pu
		u1ra
		u1ry
		u1ro
		u1ru
		u1sa
		u1sy
		u1so
		u1su
		u1ta
		u1ty
		u1to
		u1tu
		u1wa
		u1wy
		u1wo
		u1wu
		u1ýa
		u1ýy
		u1ýo
		u1ýu
		u1za
		u1zy
		u1zo
		u1zu
		u1ňa
		u1ňy
		u1ňo
		u1ňu
		u1ža
		u1žy
		u1žo
		u1žu
		u1şa
		u1şy
		u1şo
		u1şu
		a1bi
		a1be
		y1bä
		y1bi
		y1be
		o1bi
		o1be
		u1bi
		u1be
		i1ba
		i1bo
		e1ba
		e1bo
		ä1bo
		ä1ba
		ö1ba
		a1çi
		a1çe
		y1çä
		y1çi
		y1çe
		o1çi
		o1çe
		u1çi
		u1çe
		i1ça
		i1ço
		e1ça
		e1ço
		ä1ço
		ä1ça
		ö1ça
		a1di
		a1de
		y1dä
		y1di
		y1de
		o1di
		o1de
		u1di
		u1de
		i1da
		i1do
		e1da
		e1do
		ä1do
		ä1da
		ö1da
		a1fi
		a1fe
		y1fä
		y1fi
		y1fe
		o1fi
		o1fe
		u1fi
		u1fe
		i1fa
		i1fo
		e1fa
		e1fo
		ä1fo
		ä1fa
		ö1fa
		a1gi
		a1ge
		y1gä
		y1gi
		y1ge
		o1gi
		o1ge
		u1gi
		u1ge
		i1ga
		i1go
		e1ga
		e1go
		ä1go
		ä1ga
		ö1ga
		a1hi
		a1he
		y1hä
		y1hi
		y1he
		o1hi
		o1he
		u1hi
		u1he
		i1ha
		i1ho
		e1ha
		e1ho
		ä1ho
		ä1ha
		ö1ha
		a1ji
		a1je
		y1jä
		y1ji
		y1je
		o1ji
		o1je
		u1ji
		u1je
		i1ja
		i1jo
		e1ja
		e1jo
		ä1jo
		ä1ja
		ö1ja
		a1ki
		a1ke
		y1kä
		y1ki
		y1ke
		o1ki
		o1ke
		u1ki
		u1ke
		i1ka
		i1ko
		e1ka
		e1ko
		ä1ko
		ä1ka
		ö1ka
		a1li
		a1le
		y1lä
		y1li
		y1le
		o1li
		o1le
		u1li
		u1le
		i1la
		i1lo
		e1la
		e1lo
		ä1lo
		ä1la
		ö1la
		a1mi
		a1me
		y1mä
		y1mi
		y1me
		o1mi
		o1me
		u1mi
		u1me
		i1ma
		i1mo
		e1ma
		e1mo
		ä1mo
		ä1ma
		ö1ma
		a1ni
		a1ne
		y1nä
		y1ni
		y1ne
		o1ni
		o1ne
		u1ni
		u1ne
		i1na
		i1no
		e1na
		e1no
		ä1no
		ä1na
		ö1na
		a1pi
		a1pe
		y1pä
		y1pi
		y1pe
		o1pi
		o1pe
		u1pi
		u1pe
		i1pa
		i1po
		e1pa
		e1po
		ä1po
		ä1pa
		ö1pa
		a1ri
		a1re
		y1rä
		y1ri
		y1re
		o1ri
		o1re
		u1ri
		u1re
		i1ra
		i1ro
		e1ra
		e1ro
		ä1ro
		ä1ra
		ö1ra
		a1si
		a1se
		y1sä
		y1si
		y1se
		o1si
		o1se
		u1si
		u1se
		i1sa
		i1so
		e1sa
		e1so
		ä1so
		ä1sa
		ö1sa
		a1ti
		a1te
		y1tä
		y1ti
		y1te
		o1ti
		o1te
		u1ti
		u1te
		i1ta
		i1to
		e1ta
		e1to
		ä1to
		ä1ta
		ö1ta
		a1wi
		a1we
		y1wä
		y1wi
		y1we
		o1wi
		o1we
		u1wi
		u1we
		i1wa
		i1wo
		e1wa
		e1wo
		ä1wo
		ä1wa
		ö1wa
		a1ýi
		a1ýe
		y1ýä
		y1ýi
		y1ýe
		o1ýi
		o1ýe
		u1ýi
		u1ýe
		i1ýa
		i1ýo
		e1ýa
		e1ýo
		ä1ýo
		ä1ýa
		ö1ýa
		a1zi
		a1ze
		y1zä
		y1zi
		y1ze
		o1zi
		o1ze
		u1zi
		u1ze
		i1za
		i1zo
		e1za
		e1zo
		ä1zo
		ä1za
		ö1za
		a1ňi
		a1ňe
		y1ňä
		y1ňi
		y1ňe
		o1ňi
		o1ňe
		u1ňi
		u1ňe
		i1ňa
		i1ňo
		e1ňa
		e1ňo
		ä1ňo
		ä1ňa
		ö1ňa
		a1ži
		a1že
		y1žä
		y1ži
		y1že
		o1ži
		o1že
		u1ži
		u1že
		i1ža
		i1žo
		e1ža
		e1žo
		ä1žo
		ä1ža
		ö1ža
		a1şi
		a1şe
		y1şä
		y1şi
		y1şe
		o1şi
		o1şe
		u1şi
		u1şe
		i1şa
		i1şo
		e1şa
		e1şo
		ä1şo
		ä1şa
		ö1şa
		b1b
		.b2b
		b1ç
		.b2ç
		b1d
		.b2d
		b1f
		.b2f
		b1g
		.b2g
		b1h
		.b2h
		b1j
		.b2j
		b1k
		.b2k
		b1l
		.b2l
		b1m
		.b2m
		b1n
		.b2n
		b1p
		.b2p
		b1r
		.b2r
		b1s
		.b2s
		b1t
		.b2t
		b1w
		.b2w
		b1ý
		.b2ý
		b1z
		.b2z
		b1ň
		.b2ň
		b1ž
		.b2ž
		b1ş
		.b2ş
		ç1b
		.ç2b
		ç1ç
		.ç2ç
		ç1d
		.ç2d
		ç1f
		.ç2f
		ç1g
		.ç2g
		ç1h
		.ç2h
		ç1j
		.ç2j
		ç1k
		.ç2k
		ç1l
		.ç2l
		ç1m
		.ç2m
		ç1n
		.ç2n
		ç1p
		.ç2p
		ç1r
		.ç2r
		ç1s
		.ç2s
		ç1t
		.ç2t
		ç1w
		.ç2w
		ç1ý
		.ç2ý
		ç1z
		.ç2z
		ç1ň
		.ç2ň
		ç1ž
		.ç2ž
		ç1ş
		.ç2ş
		d1b
		.d2b
		d1ç
		.d2ç
		d1d
		.d2d
		d1f
		.d2f
		d1g
		.d2g
		d1h
		.d2h
		d1j
		.d2j
		d1k
		.d2k
		d1l
		.d2l
		d1m
		.d2m
		d1n
		.d2n
		d1p
		.d2p
		d1r
		.d2r
		d1s
		.d2s
		d1t
		.d2t
		d1w
		.d2w
		d1ý
		.d2ý
		d1z
		.d2z
		d1ň
		.d2ň
		d1ž
		.d2ž
		d1ş
		.d2ş
		f1b
		.f2b
		f1ç
		.f2ç
		f1d
		.f2d
		f1f
		.f2f
		f1g
		.f2g
		f1h
		.f2h
		f1j
		.f2j
		f1k
		.f2k
		f1l
		.f2l
		f1m
		.f2m
		f1n
		.f2n
		f1p
		.f2p
		f1r
		.f2r
		f1s
		.f2s
		f1t
		.f2t
		f1w
		.f2w
		f1ý
		.f2ý
		f1z
		.f2z
		f1ň
		.f2ň
		f1ž
		.f2ž
		f1ş
		.f2ş
		g1b
		.g2b
		g1ç
		.g2ç
		g1d
		.g2d
		g1f
		.g2f
		g1g
		.g2g
		g1h
		.g2h
		g1j
		.g2j
		g1k
		.g2k
		g1l
		.g2l
		g1m
		.g2m
		g1n
		.g2n
		g1p
		.g2p
		g1r
		.g2r
		g1s
		.g2s
		g1t
		.g2t
		g1w
		.g2w
		g1ý
		.g2ý
		g1z
		.g2z
		g1ň
		.g2ň
		g1ž
		.g2ž
		g1ş
		.g2ş
		h1b
		.h2b
		h1ç
		.h2ç
		h1d
		.h2d
		h1f
		.h2f
		h1g
		.h2g
		h1h
		.h2h
		h1j
		.h2j
		h1k
		.h2k
		h1l
		.h2l
		h1m
		.h2m
		h1n
		.h2n
		h1p
		.h2p
		h1r
		.h2r
		h1s
		.h2s
		h1t
		.h2t
		h1w
		.h2w
		h1ý
		.h2ý
		h1z
		.h2z
		h1ň
		.h2ň
		h1ž
		.h2ž
		h1ş
		.h2ş
		j1b
		.j2b
		j1ç
		.j2ç
		j1d
		.j2d
		j1f
		.j2f
		j1g
		.j2g
		j1h
		.j2h
		j1j
		.j2j
		j1k
		.j2k
		j1l
		.j2l
		j1m
		.j2m
		j1n
		.j2n
		j1p
		.j2p
		j1r
		.j2r
		j1s
		.j2s
		j1t
		.j2t
		j1w
		.j2w
		j1ý
		.j2ý
		j1z
		.j2z
		j1ň
		.j2ň
		j1ž
		.j2ž
		j1ş
		.j2ş
		k1b
		.k2b
		k1ç
		.k2ç
		k1d
		.k2d
		k1f
		.k2f
		k1g
		.k2g
		k1h
		.k2h
		k1j
		.k2j
		k1k
		.k2k
		k1l
		.k2l
		k1m
		.k2m
		k1n
		.k2n
		k1p
		.k2p
		k1r
		.k2r
		k1s
		.k2s
		k1t
		.k2t
		k1w
		.k2w
		k1ý
		.k2ý
		k1z
		.k2z
		k1ň
		.k2ň
		k1ž
		.k2ž
		k1ş
		.k2ş
		l1b
		.l2b
		l1ç
		.l2ç
		l1d
		.l2d
		l1f
		.l2f
		l1g
		.l2g
		l1h
		.l2h
		l1j
		.l2j
		l1k
		.l2k
		l1l
		.l2l
		l1m
		.l2m
		l1n
		.l2n
		l1p
		.l2p
		l1r
		.l2r
		l1s
		.l2s
		l1t
		.l2t
		l1w
		.l2w
		l1ý
		.l2ý
		l1z
		.l2z
		l1ň
		.l2ň
		l1ž
		.l2ž
		l1ş
		.l2ş
		m1b
		.m2b
		m1ç
		.m2ç
		m1d
		.m2d
		m1f
		.m2f
		m1g
		.m2g
		m1h
		.m2h
		m1j
		.m2j
		m1k
		.m2k
		m1l
		.m2l
		m1m
		.m2m
		m1n
		.m2n
		m1p
		.m2p
		m1r
		.m2r
		m1s
		.m2s
		m1t
		.m2t
		m1w
		.m2w
		m1ý
		.m2ý
		m1z
		.m2z
		m1ň
		.m2ň
		m1ž
		.m2ž
		m1ş
		.m2ş
		n1b
		.n2b
		n1ç
		.n2ç
		n1d
		.n2d
		n1f
		.n2f
		n1g
		.n2g
		n1h
		.n2h
		n1j
		.n2j
		n1k
		.n2k
		n1l
		.n2l
		n1m
		.n2m
		n1n
		.n2n
		n1p
		.n2p
		n1r
		.n2r
		n1s
		.n2s
		n1t
		.n2t
		n1w
		.n2w
		n1ý
		.n2ý
		n1z
		.n2z
		n1ň
		.n2ň
		n1ž
		.n2ž
		n1ş
		.n2ş
		p1b
		.p2b
		p1ç
		.p2ç
		p1d
		.p2d
		p1f
		.p2f
		p1g
		.p2g
		p1h
		.p2h
		p1j
		.p2j
		p1k
		.p2k
		p1l
		.p2l
		p1m
		.p2m
		p1n
		.p2n
		p1p
		.p2p
		p1r
		.p2r
		p1s
		.p2s
		p1t
		.p2t
		p1w
		.p2w
		p1ý
		.p2ý
		p1z
		.p2z
		p1ň
		.p2ň
		p1ž
		.p2ž
		p1ş
		.p2ş
		r1b
		.r2b
		r1ç
		.r2ç
		r1d
		.r2d
		r1f
		.r2f
		r1g
		.r2g
		r1h
		.r2h
		r1j
		.r2j
		r1k
		.r2k
		r1l
		.r2l
		r1m
		.r2m
		r1n
		.r2n
		r1p
		.r2p
		r1r
		.r2r
		r1s
		.r2s
		r1t
		.r2t
		r1w
		.r2w
		r1ý
		.r2ý
		r1z
		.r2z
		r1ň
		.r2ň
		r1ž
		.r2ž
		r1ş
		.r2ş
		s1b
		.s2b
		s1ç
		.s2ç
		s1d
		.s2d
		s1f
		.s2f
